en: Green curry pastes, Green curry paste
da: Grønne karrypastaer
de: Grüne Currypasten, Grüne Currypaste
fr: Pâtes de curry verte, Pâtes de curry vert
hr: Zelene curry paste
lt: Žaliojo kario pasta
nb: Grønne karripastaer
nl: Groene Currypastas
nn: Grøne karripastaer
pl: Zielone pasty curry
sv: Gröna currypastor

en: Phanaeng curry pastes, Phanaeng curry paste, Panang curry pastes, Panang curry paste, Penang curry pastes, Penang curry paste
de: Panaeng Currypasten, Panaeng Currypaste, Panang Currypasten, Panang Currypaste
hr: Phanaeng curry paste
pl: Pasty curry panang

en: Massaman curry pastes, Massaman curry paste
de: Massaman Currypasten, Massaman Currypaste
fr: Pâtes de curry Massaman
hr: Masaman curry paste
pl: Pasty curry Massaman

en: Yellow curry pastes, Yellow curry paste
da: Gule karrypastaer
de: Gelbe Currypasten, Gelbe Currypaste
fr: Pâtes de curry jaunes
hr: Žute curry paste
lt: Geltonojo kario pasta
nb: Gule karripastaer
nl: Gele Currypastas
nn: Gule karripastaer
pl: Żółte pasty curry
sv: Gulor currypastor

en: Masala pastes
da: Masalapastaer
de: Masalapasten, Masalapaste
es: Pastas de masala, Pasta de masala
fi: Masalatahnat
fr: Pâtes de masala, Masala paste
hr: Masala paste
it: Pasta di masala
lt: Masala pasta
nb: Masalapastaer
nl: Masala pastas, Masalapastas
nn: Masalapastaer, Masalapastaar
pl: Pasty masala
sv: Masalapastor

en: Glazes with vinegar
es: Cremas de vinagre, cremas con vinagre
fr: Crèmes de vinaigre, Crèmes au vinaigre
hr: Glazure octom
it: Glasse con aceto

en: Glazes with balsamic vinegar
fr: Crèmes de vinaigre balsamique

en: Glazes with white vinegar
fr: Crèmes de vinaigre blanc

en: Tamarind paste
nl: Tamarinde pasta

en: Culinary plants, condiment plants, edible plants
ca: Plantes culinàries, condiments vegetals, plantes comestibles
da: Kulinariske planter, Spiselige planter
de: Eßbare Pflanzen
es: Plantas culinarias
fi: ruokakasvit
fr: Plantes condimentaires, Plante condimentaire
he: צמחים למאכל
hr: Kulinarske biljke
hu: Kulináris növények, fűszer növények
it: Erbe e piante aromatiche
lt: Prieskoniniai augalai, kulinariniai augalai
nl: Plantaardige smaakmakers
pt: Plantas para culinária
sv: Kulinariska växter, Ätbara växter
zh: 食用植物

en: Edible flowers
ar: زهور صالحة للأكل
be: Ядомыя кветкі
cs: Jedlý květ
da: Spiselige blomster
de: Eßblüte
es: Flor comestible
eu: Lore jangarri
fi: Syötävät kukat, Syötävä kukka
fr: Fleurs comestibles
gl: Flor comestible
hu: Ehető virág
hy: Ուտելի ծաղիկներ
id: Bunga pangan
it: Fiore commestibile
ja: エディブル・フラワー
jv: Kembang sing bisa dipangan
ko: 식용 꽃
nb: Spiselige blomster
nl: Eetbare bloem
nn: Matblomar
oc: Flor comestibla
pl: Kwiaty jadalne
ro: Floare comestibilă
ru: Съедобный цветок
sl: Užitni cvet
sr: Јестиви цвет
sv: Ätliga blommor, Ätbara blommor
uk: Їстівні квіти
zh: 食用花

en: Grated horseradish
de: Geriebener Meerrettich
fr: Raifort râpé
hr: Ribani hren
lt: Tarkuoti krienai
nl: Geraspte rammenassen
pl: Chrzan tarty

en: Fresh horseradish
fr: Raifort
hr: Svježi hren
lt: Švieži krienai
pl: Chrzan świeży

en: Horseradish mousse
fr: Mousses de raifort
hr: Pjena od hrena
lt: Krienų putėsiai
pl: Krem chrzanowy

en: Aromatic plants
ca: Plantes aromàtiques
da: Aromatiske planter
de: Gewürzpflanzen
es: Plantas aromáticas
fi: aromaattiset kasvit
fr: Plantes aromatiques, Plante aromatique
hr: Aromatične biljke
it: Piante aromatiche
lt: Aromatiniai augalai
nl: Aromatische planten
pt: Plantas aromáticas
sv: Aromatiska växter
zh: 芳香植物

en: Fresh aromatic plants
de: frische Gewürzpflanzen
es: Plantas aromáticas frescas
fr: Plantes aromatiques fraîches
hr: Svježe aromatične biljke
lt: Švieži aromatiniai augalai
nl: Verse aromatische planten
sv: Färska aromatiska växter

en: Frozen aromatic plants
de: gefrorene Gewürzpflanzen
es: Plantas aromáticas congeladas
fr: Plantes aromatiques surgelées
hr: Smrznuto aromatično bilje
it: Piante aromatiche surgelate
lt: Šaldyti aromatiniai augalai
nl: Diepvries aromatische planten

en: Dried aromatic plants
de: getrocknete Gewürzflanzen
es: Plantas aromáticas secas
fr: Plantes aromatiques sèches
hr: Osušene aromatične biljke
lt: Džiovinti aromatiniai augalai
nl: Gedroogde aromatische planten
sv: Torkade aromatiska växter

en: Ground dried aromatic plants
de: Getrocknete und gemahlene Kräuter
es: Plantas aromáticas secas molidas, Plantas aromáticas secas en polvo
fi: jauhetut kuivatut maustekasvit
fr: Plantes aromatiques sèches moulues
hr: Mljevene osušene aromatične biljke
it: Piante aromatiche essiccate e macinate
lt: Džiovinti sumalti aromatiniai augalai
nl: Gedroogde en gemalen aromatische planten

en: Lyophilized aromatic plants, Freeze-dried aromatic plants
de: Gefriergetrocknete Gewürzpflanzen
es: Plantas aromáticas liofilizadas
fr: Plantes aromatiques lyophilisées
hr: Liofilizirane aromatične biljke
it: Piante aromatiche liofilizzate
lt: Liofilizuoti aromatiniai augalai, Šalčiu džiovinti aromatiniai augalai
nl: Gevriesdroogde aromatische planten
sv: Frystorkade aromatiska växter